Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1913
Eligible postsecondary educational
institutions; duties.

Eligible postsecondary educational
institutions, acting as agents of the commission, shall:

(1) Receive and process applications for awards under the Nebraska Opportunity Grant Act;

(2) Determine eligibility of students based on criteria set forth in
the act; and

(3) At any time prior to June 1 of each award year, make recommendations
as often as necessary to the commission for awards to eligible students, including
the name of each eligible student, social security number of each eligible
student, and recommended award amount for each eligible student.

Laws 2003, LB 574, § 13;

Laws 2010, LB956, § 12.